Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB693.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 116.035 is amended to read as follows:
The following rules, so far as applicable, shall be observed in determining the residence
of a person offering to vote:
(1) A voter's residence shall be deemed to be at the place where his or her habitation is,
and to which, when absent, he or she has the intention of returning. A voter shall be
deemed a resident of a city within the county of his or her habitation if he or she
has at least fifty percent (50%) ownership in a property located within the city
precinct. For a person who is homeless and lacks an established and fixed nighttime
residence of regular return, he or she may elect a location with a fixed address as a
place of habitation, which shall be considered his or her residence, and may include
the following:
(a) A supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide
temporary living accommodations; or
(b) A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular
sleeping accommodation for human beings;
(2) A voter shall not lose his or her residence by absence for temporary purposes
merely; nor shall he or she obtain a residence by being in a county or precinct for
such temporary purposes, without the intention of making that county or precinct
his or her home;
(3) A voter shall lose his or her residence by removal to another state or county with
intention to make his or her permanent residence there, or by removal to and
residence in another state, with intention to reside there an indefinite time, or by
voting there, even though he or she may have had the intention to return to this state
at some future period;
(4) The place where the family of a married person resides shall generally be
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1668
considered his or her residence, unless the family so resides for a temporary
purpose. If his family is permanently in one (1) place, and he or she transacts
business in another, the former shall be the residence.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:12 PM Jacketed